Maryland, session 2025, HB0285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–506.
(a) (1) A copy of a list of registered voters shall be provided to a Maryland
registered voter on receipt of:
(i) a written application; and
(ii) a statement, signed under oath, that the list is not intended to be
used for:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0285*

HOUSE BILL 285
1. commercial solicitation; or
2. any other purpose not related to the electoral process.
(2) In consultation with the local boards, the State Board shall adopt
regulations that specify:
(i) the time for a list to be provided under this subsection;
(ii) the authorization to be required for providing a list;
(iii) the fee to be paid for providing a list;
(iv) the information to be included on a list;
(v) that the residence address of an individual who is a participant
in an address confidentiality program may not be disclosed;
(vi) that a participant in an address confidentiality program is not
required to apply to the State Board to keep the individual’s residence address confidential;
(vii) the format of the information; and
(viii) the medium or media on which the information is to be provided.
(3) (I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ON REQUEST OF A CANDIDATE, THE STATE BOARD OR A LOCAL BOARD
SHALL PROVIDE THE CANDIDATE WITH A LIST OF REGISTERED VOTERS WHO HAVE
REQUESTED AN ABSENTEE BALLOT FOR AN UPCOMING ELECTION.
(II) A LIST OF REGISTERED VOTERS PROVIDED TO A CANDIDATE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE THE E–MAIL
ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF EACH VOTER ON THE LIST IF THE
INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.